Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.320

Running start program—Information on enrollment.

A school district shall provide general information about the program to all pupils in grades 10, 11, and 12 and the parents and guardians of those pupils, including information about the opportunity to enroll in the program through online courses available at community and technical colleges and other state institutions of higher education, enrollment opportunities during the summer academic term, and including the college high school diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535. To assist the district in planning, a pupil shall inform the district of the pupil's intent to enroll in courses at an institution of higher education for credit. Students are responsible for applying for admission to the institution of higher education.

[ 2024 c 159 s 3; 2009 c 524 s 4; 2008 c 95 s 3; 1994 c 205 s 3; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 403.]

NOTES:

Finding—2024 c 159: See note following RCW 28A.600.310.

Intent—2009 c 524: See note following RCW 28B.50.535.

Finding—2008 c 95: See note following RCW 28A.300.119.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.